Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1810.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Retail Worker Safety and Preparedness Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Covered location." A permanent physical establishment that is operated by a retail employer and open to the public in this Commonwealth."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Larger facility." A commercial or public premises that 12345678910111213141516171819 contains one or more distinct business entities and is operated under unified management or ownership, including an airport, sports venue, shopping mall or convention center."Master operator." The person or entity responsible for the overall security and emergency management operations of a larger facility."Plan." The workplace violence prevention plan required under section 3(a)."Retail employer." A business entity that employs 15 or more employees at a physical commercial location where goods or services are sold directly to consumers."Workplace violence." An act or threat of physical violence, harassment, intimidation or similar disruptive behavior that occurs at a retail workplace.Section 3. Workplace violence prevention plan.(a) Development.--A retail employer shall develop and maintain a written workplace violence prevention plan. The plan shall include all of the following:(1) Identification of potential workplace violence risks specific to each covered location.(2) Procedures for responding to incidents of workplace violence.(3) Designation of a supervisor or manager responsible for implementation of the plan.(4) Emergency contact and evacuation information posted clearly in employee-accessible areas.(b) Updates and access.--A retail employer shall review and update the plan at least annually and shall make the plan available to employees upon request.Section 4. Employee training requirements.20250HB1810PN2225 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Requirements.--A retail employer shall provide annual training to employees on all of the following topics:(1) Recognition of workplace violence or threats and appropriate responses.(2) Procedures for deescalation and seeking assistance.(3) Procedures for reporting incidents of workplace violence to a supervisor, manager or law enforcement official, as appropriate.(b) Language accessibility.--A retail employer shall provide training in a language understood by each employee and shall make translated training materials available when necessary to ensure comprehension.Section 5. Emergency communication devices.(a) Applicability.--Except as provided under subsection (d), this section shall apply to a retail employer that operates a covered location with 40 or more on-site employees.(b) Installation.--A retail employer shall install and maintain panic buttons or similar emergency communication devices at key frontline stations, including all of the following:(1) Checkout counters.(2) Customer service desks.(3) Security posts or loss prevention offices.(c) Functionality.--A retail employer shall ensure that each panic button or emergency communication device is configured to immediately notify all of the following:(1) On-site managers or security personnel.(2) Local emergency services or an internal security system with the capacity to escalate the alert to external emergency responders.20250HB1810PN2225 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Exception.--This section shall not apply to a covered location that is situated within a larger facility if a master operator is responsible for the security and emergency response plan for the larger facility and the retail employer does not control or maintain a separate emergency response plan for the covered location.Section 6. Enforcement.(a) Administration.--The department shall administer and enforce this act. For the purpose of administering and enforcing this act, the department may:(1) develop sample plans, templates and guidance materials for retail employers;(2) conduct inspections and request documentation to verify compliance with this act; and(3) issue notices of noncompliance and require corrective action.(b) Penalties.--The following shall apply to violations of this act:(1) For a first violation, the department shall issue a written warning and may require submission of a corrective action plan.(2) For a second or subsequent violation occurring within a 24-month period, the department may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $2,000 per violation.(c) Compliance period.--During the first year after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall prioritize education and technical assistance before imposing a penalty under subsection (b).(d) Appeals.--A decision by the department to enforce this act under this section shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 20250HB1810PN2225 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 7. Regulations.The department shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement and enforce the provisions of this act within 180 days of the effective date of this section.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in one year.20250HB1810PN2225 - 5 - 123456789